Kansas, session 2025-2026, SB61.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Kansas:
Section 1. K.S.A. 26-509 is hereby amended to read as follows: 26-
509. (a) In an action on appeal the court shall assign the case for trial to a
jury, or to a master in accordance with K.S.A. 60-253, or acts amendatory
thereof or supplemental and amendments thereto. Except as provided in
subsection (b), whenever the plaintiff condemner shall appeal the award of
court appointed appraisers, and the jury renders a verdict for the
landowners landowner in an amount greater than said such appraisers'
award, the court may allow as court costs an amount to be paid to the
landowner's attorney as attorney fees.
(b) If the plaintiff condemner is an electric public utility, whenever
such plaintiff condemner or landowner shall appeal the award of court
appointed appraisers and the jury or master renders a verdict for the
landowner in an amount greater than such appraisers' award, the court
shall allow as court costs an amount to be paid to the landowner's
attorney as attorney fees.
Sec. 2. K.S.A. 26-509 is hereby repealed.
Sec. 3. This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its
publication in the statute book.